Utah statutes.
76-3-203.4.   Hate crimes -- Aggravating factors.
(1)  The sentencing judge or the Board of Pardons and Parole shall consider in
their deliberations as an aggravating factor the public harm resulting from
the commission of the offense, including the degree to which the offense is
likely to incite community unrest or cause members of the community to
reasonably fear for their physical safety or to freely exercise or enjoy any
right secured by the Constitution or laws of the state or by the Constitution
or laws of the United States.
(2)  The sentencing judge or the Board of Pardons and Parole shall also
consider whether the penalty for the offense is already increased by other
existing provisions of law.
(3)  This section does not affect or limit any individual's constitutional
right to the lawful expression of free speech or other recognized rights
secured by the Constitution or laws of the state or by the Constitution or
laws of the United States.
